Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.815

Code city retaining former second-class city plan—Appointive officers.

In a city initially classified as a second-class city prior to January 1, 1993, that retained its second-class city plan of government when the city reorganized as a noncharter code city, the appointive officers shall be a chief of police, city attorney, health officer, and street commissioner; the council may also create by ordinance the offices of superintendent of irrigation, city engineer, harbor master, pound keeper, city jailer, chief of the fire department, and any other offices necessary to discharge the functions of the city and for whose election or appointment no other provision is made. If a paid fire department is established therein a chief engineer and one or more assistant engineers may be appointed. If a free library and reading room is established therein five library trustees shall be appointed. The council by ordinance shall prescribe the duties of the officers and fix their compensation subject to the provisions of any statutes pertaining thereto.

[ 1994 c 81 s 27; 1965 c 7 s 35.23.120. Prior: 1949 c 83 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9007A. Formerly RCW 35.23.120.]